Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4008
False or misleading
information prohibited; updates
required.

No person subject to the
Sex Offender Registration Act shall knowingly and willfully furnish any false
or misleading information in the registration or fail to provide or timely update law enforcement of
any of the information required to be provided by the act.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 28.

The phrase "knowingly and willfully" in this section applies only to the furnishing of false and misleading information and not to the failure to update information. State v. Clark, 22 Neb. App. 124, 849 N.W.2d 151 (2014).